Arkansas, session 2025, HB1237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

Section 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 80, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-80-123. Solicitation of injured individuals.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Medical professional” means a person licensed or certified
to practice healthcare services under Subtitle 3 of Title 17; and
(2) “Solicitation” means in-person, telemarketing, telephonic,
text message, internet, or electronic direct message communication.
(b) A medical professional, including his or her employee, agent, or
independent contractor, shall not conduct or facilitate the solicitation of
an individual who has been injured or involved in an accident, disaster, or
other event that causes injury for the purpose of treating injuries that the
individual sustained or may have sustained in the accident, disaster, or
*JMB200*
01/24/2025 10:26:09 AM JMB200

HB1237
other event, unless:
(1) The medical professional has a family or prior professional
relationship with the individual; or
(2) The solicitation occurs more than thirty (30) days after the
date of the accident, disaster, or other event that causes the injury.
(c)(1) A violation of this section is a Class D felony.
(2)(A) An agreement to pay for healthcare services provided by a
medical professional as a result of a violation of this section is invalid.
(B) A person shall not collect or pursue collection for
any debt arising from an agreement as described in subdivision (c)(2)(A) of
this section.
(3) A patient, person, or insurance company who paid as a result
of an agreement described in subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall
receive:
(A) A complete refund of money paid for healthcare
services provided by a medical professional resulting from a violation of
this section; and
(B) Reasonable attorney’s fees incurred when collecting
the refund described in subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section.
(d) This section does not prohibit solicitation by targeted direct-
mail advertising or other forms of written, radio, or television advertising,
provided the advertising does not involve coercion, duress, or harassment and
is not false, deceptive, or misleading.
(e) A violation of this section is a deceptive and unconscionable
trade practice under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.,
and is subject to the enforcement provisions of the Deceptive Trade Practices
Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.
(f) A person suffering a pecuniary loss due to a violation of this
section may bring a private cause of action in any court of competent
jurisdiction and shall recover:
(1) The pecuniary loss caused by the violation;
(2) Costs;
(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees; and
(4) The greater of:
(A) Five hundred dollars ($500); or
(B) Twice the amount of the pecuniary loss.
01/24/2025 10:26:09 AM JMB200

HB1237
(g) The relief provided in this section is in addition to remedies or
penalties otherwise available in regard to the same conduct under law or
under other statutes of this state.

































01/24/2025 10:26:09 AM JMB200